src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abbilleri/IZ
abbistu/FZ
abboghinadore/GZ
abbruxaderi/IZ
abbruxeri/IZ
abbuloteri/IZl
acabbadore/GZ
acaidore/GZ
acapidadore/GZ
achiadore/GZ
achiladori/GZ
aciaputzadore/GZ
aciseri/IZ
aciuperi/IZ
acoglidore/GZ
aconcadori/GZ
acreadori/GZ
acru/FZ
acuaderi/IZ
acuadori/GZ
acuardenteri/IZ
acuncadori/GZ
acutzadori/GZ
addobbadore/GZ
afangadore/GZ
afastiadori/GZ
afenadore/GZ
afiliverradore/GZ
afissu/FZ
afracadore/GZ
afranzadore/GZ
afrochedheri/IZ
afrodhieri/IZ
afrodhoncheri/IZ
afrusadori/GZ
afumentadore/GZ
afusadore/GZ
aggraviadori/GZ
aggutiperadore/GZ
agratzeri/IZ
agru/FZ
alabantzeri/IZ
aldieri/IZ
alemusineri/IZ
alimentadore/GZ
allegru/FZ
allergu/FZ
allevadore/GZ
alligru/FZ
allirgu/FZ
allisadori/GZ
alluidori/GZ
allupadore/GZ
allutu/FZ
altu/FZg
amargu/FZ
ambuleri/IZ
amicu/FZ
amigu/FZa
amistantzieri/IZ
ammaghiadore/GZ
ammajeteri/IZ
ammamidhadore/GZ
ammanudadore/GZ
ammediadori/GZ
ammonestadore/GZ
ammuntadore/GZ
amplificadore/GZ
amplu/FZ
ampru/FZ
andadori/GZ
androgheri/IZ
anfaneri/IZl
annadore/GZ
annomingiadori/GZ
apagiadori/GZ
apanedhadore/GZ
apaxiadori/GZ
apedrigadore/GZ
apilandradore/GZ
aposentadore/GZ
aprovendhadore/GZ
araderi/IZ
arbu/FZ
archiviadore/GZ
argamundheri/IZ
argioleri/IZ
argu/FZ
aringeri/IZ
arongeri/IZ
arralleri/IZ
arrastadori/GZ
arrebuseri/IZ
arreguadori/GZ
arretu/FZ
arricidori/GZ
arricu/FZ
arroliadori/GZ
arrostidore/GZ
arruseri/IZ
arrustidore/GZ
artu/FZ
arxoleri/IZ
asciutu/FZ
aspru/FZ
aspu/FZ
assachieri/IZ
assebertadore/GZ
asselieri/IZ
assumbradore/GZ
astrintu/FZ
astudhidore/GZ
asureri/IZ
asurieri/IZ
atatzadore/GZ
atentu/FZ
atraessadore/GZ
atripadori/GZ
atzegu/FZ
atzitzadori/GZ
atzorodheri/IZl
aurridore/GZ
aventureri/IZ
avintureri/IZ
babuleri/IZ
bacasseri/IZ
badaceri/IZ
badhadori/GZ
bagamundheri/IZl
bagamunneri/IZ
bagasseri/IZl
bagianeri/IZ
baltzaneri/IZ
bambu/FZ
bandhuleri/IZ
bandulleri/IZ
bantageri/IZ
bantaxeri/IZ
bantazeri/IZ
baraundheri/IZ
bardaneri/IZ
barracheri/IZ
barriadori/GZ
bassineri/IZ
batalleri/IZl
batizeri/IZl
batraxeri/IZ
bauridore/GZ
beferi/IZ
bellu/FZ
benidore/GZ
bentureri/IZ
betuleri/IZ
betzone/GZ
betzu/FZ
biancu/FZ
bichiloni/GZ
bintureri/IZ
birranderi/IZ
biseri/IZ
bistrasceri/IZ
bitueri/IZ
bituleri/IZ
blagheri/IZ
bodheteri/IZ
bodhidori/GZ
bonu/FZ
brafanteri/IZ
bragheri/IZ
bragheteri/IZ
braghiteri/IZ
brandhu/FZ
brandu/FZ
brantaxeri/IZ
bravanteri/IZ
bravu/FZ
brincadore/GZ
brinculeri/IZ
brujadore/GZ
brundhu/FZ
brundu/FZ
brunu/FZ
brunzeri/IZ
brutu/FZ
buculeri/IZ
bufadore/GZ
buldu/FZ
bulieri/IZ
burdu/FZ
buruleri/IZ
cafiteri/IZ
cagadore/GZ
calamistreri/IZ
calmu/FZ
campadore/GZ
cantu/FZ
carateri/IZ
carchidadore/GZ
carcu/FZ
carmu/FZ
carraxeri/IZ
caru/FZ
casineri/IZ
cassadore/GZ
castangeri/IZ
catoceri/IZ
certadori/GZ
chighineri/IZ
chircadore/GZ
chisineri/IZ
chitu/FZ
ciaciareri/IZ
ciaputzeri/IZl
cionfraderi/IZ
ciopu/FZ
cisteri/IZl
ciurpu/FZ
coeteri/IZ
coglionadore/GZ
collunadori/GZ
comporadore/GZ
confusioneri/IZ
consilleri/IZ
contzilleri/IZ
corroveri/IZ
coseri/IZ
cossoladore/GZ
costazeri/IZ
crabioneri/IZ
cracu/FZ
craru/FZ
crastuleri/IZ
cratzatore/GZ
crefu/FZ
crispu/FZ
criticadore/GZ
crochidore/GZ
crocoleri/IZ
crudu/FZ
crutzu/FZ
cuenteri/IZ
cugliunadori/GZ
cumbatadore/GZ
cumintzadore/GZ
cumpressore/GZ
cuntrunieri/IZ
currezidore/GZ
currilleri/IZl
curtzu/FZ
curvu/FZ
cussizadore/GZ
cussizeri/IZh
degumadore/GZ
dengheri/IZ
destruidori/GZ
dispenseri/IZ
dispintadore/GZ
divisore/GZ
dolidori/GZ
doltu/FZ
donadore/GZ
drogadore/GZ
eciseri/IZl
esaminadore/GZ
faidori/GZ
faineri/IZ
falsu/FZ
faltzu/FZ
fanfalucheri/IZ
farsu/FZ
fartzu/FZ
fatuzeri/IZ
fatzienneri/IZ
faulone/GZ
fessu/FZ
festizadore/GZ
fiantzeri/IZ
filadore/GZ
fingidori/GZ
fintzeri/IZ
fitadore/GZ
fogoneri/IZ
forredheri/IZ
forrogadori/GZ
forrogheri/IZ
fracheri/IZ
frallusteri/IZ
francu/FZ
frassu/FZ
fratadore/GZ
fridu/FZ
frighidore/GZ
friscu/FZ
frissu/FZ
fritu/FZ
frodheri/IZ
fruceri/IZ
fruschinadore/GZ
frustigheri/IZ
fuidore/GZ
fulbu/FZ
fumiadori/GZ
furbu/FZ
furone/GZ
fuxileri/IZ
gastu/FZ
gherradore/GZ
gherreri/IZ
ghiadori/GZ
giaru/FZ
giogadori/GZ
giogheri/IZ
giriteri/IZ
gramuzadore/GZ
grassu/FZ
grilliadore/GZ
grogu/FZ
grusseri/IZ
guastu/FZ
ifascadore/GZ
illuchidadore/GZ
imbenteri/IZh
imborduleri/IZ
imbrastieri/IZ
imbreacone/GZ
imbriagoni/GZ
imbruncadore/GZ
imbrunconeri/IZl
imbucadori/GZ
imbusteri/IZ
impalladori/GZ
imparaderi/IZ
impedidori/GZ
impiasteri/IZ
impicadore/GZ
imprabastuleri/IZ
imprastuladore/GZ
impriastone/GZ
improseri/IZ
improvisadore/GZ
incalamistreri/IZ
incatramadore/GZ
incorradori/GZ
incorredheri/IZ
indicadore/GZ
infulmadori/GZ
ingannadori/GZ
inganneri/IZh
ingregheri/IZ
ingullione/GZ
ingurtidore/GZ
innischitzeri/IZ
innoriadore/GZ
intonadori/GZ
intrammasseri/IZ
intzuleri/IZ
invasore/GZ
irforticadore/GZ
irgherrimiadore/GZ
irricu/FZ
iscaminadore/GZ
iscandhuleri/IZ
ischidore/GZ
iscultadore/GZ
iscurtzu/FZ
isfustu/FZ
isgamandrone/GZ
ispaconi/GZ
isperdidore/GZ
ispertu/FZ
ispetzieri/IZ
ispiadore/GZ
ispizadore/GZ
ispremidore/GZ
ispuntilladore/GZ
istancu/FZ
istangheri/IZ
istimadore/GZ
istracu/FZ
istramu/FZ
istratzeri/IZ
istrintu/FZ
istutadore/GZ
isureri/IZ
lacasineri/IZ
ladu/FZ
lalgu/FZ
làngiu/FZ
lanzu/FZ
largu/FZ
lascu/FZ
latrangheri/IZ
latzu/FZ
lentu/FZ
lenu/FZ
leperi/IZ
lestru/FZ
lestu/FZ
letrangheri/IZ
lezu/FZ
licaldoni/GZ
ligeri/IZ
limusineri/IZ
lizeri/IZ
locu/FZ
lodhuradore/GZ
longarione/GZ
longu/FZ
luntu/FZ
lusingheri/IZ
macu/FZ
majadore/GZ
maleteri/IZ
malu/FZ
mandiadori/GZ
mandragheri/IZ
mangiufoni/GZ
manipuladore/GZ
mantenidori/GZ
maraguglieri/IZ
marfuseri/IZ
marraneri/IZ
marranzone/GZ
martinincheri/IZ
mataneri/IZh
mataudhone/GZ
matzamurreri/IZ
mazineri/IZ
meigheri/IZ
mengoni/GZ
mesculadore/GZ
mimingheri/IZ
mineri/IZ
miradore/GZ
mortipricadore/GZ
mortorzeri/IZ
mudulone/GZ
mufroni/GZ
munitzioneri/IZ
murrioni/GZ
murru/FZ
mustrencheri/IZ
mutricone/GZ
negossiatore/GZ
netu/FZ
nidu/FZ
nuineri/IZl
numeradore/GZ
oghiteri/IZ
ordidore/GZ
oridore/GZ
ospederi/IZ
osserbadore/GZ
pacu/FZ
palatore/GZ
palleri/IZ
paneteri/IZ
paraderi/IZ
parpadore/GZ
passigeri/IZ
pasteri/IZ
patidore/GZ
pazeri/IZ
pedidori/GZ
pensadore/GZ
perificadori/GZ
piantu/FZ
pibincheri/IZ
piconeri/IZ
pideri/IZ
pigineri/IZ
pillingroneri/IZ
pillonadori/GZ
pioleri/IZ
piranciuleri/IZ
pissichidore/GZ
pistizoneri/IZ
pitulleri/IZ
plenu/FZx
pobidheri/IZ
porridore/GZ
postu/FZg
praneri/IZ
pranu/FZ
precoceri/IZ
prediconeri/IZ
prentzadori/GZ
prenu/FZ
pretadori/GZ
prinnigheri/IZ
prontu/FZ
pulitzadore/GZ
pulpuzeri/IZ
puntu/FZ
ragateri/IZ
raru/FZ
rasadore/GZ
raspinnadore/GZ
rassu/FZ
rebbuseri/IZ
rebuzeri/IZ
redadore/GZ
reparadore/GZ
retificadore/GZ
retrancheri/IZ
rivolussioneri/IZ
rujulone/GZ
runneri/IZ
russu/FZ
rutu/FZ
ruzone/GZ
saboneri/IZ
salvadori/GZ
santificadore/GZ
santu/FZ
sanu/FZ
sardu/FZ
sassagoni/GZ
sbeliadori/GZ
scabeceri/IZ
scabeciadori/GZ
scarsu/FZ
scassu/FZ
scedatzadori/GZ
sciadetzedori/GZ
sciampitadori/GZ
sciarodheri/IZ
scioreri/IZ
sciustu/FZ
scovadori/GZ
scrilliteri/IZ
scrufidori/GZ
scuceri/IZ
secadore/GZ
segadori/GZ
separadore/GZ
serpenteri/IZ
serradore/GZ
setzidori/GZ
sfamieri/IZ
sgalluponi/GZ
sicu/FZ
sinnaladori/GZg
smerduladori/GZ
sorbeteri/IZ
soricadore/GZ
spageri/IZ
spalligadori/GZ
spantaculeri/IZ
spartzinadori/GZ
speculeri/IZ
spertadori/GZ
sprepedheri/IZ
spuntu/FZ
storradori/GZ
straderi/IZ
stramu/FZ
straviadori/GZ
strechedheri/IZ
strimisseri/IZ
strintu/FZ
strunciadori/GZ
suciadori/GZ
suldu/FZ
sulteri/IZ
sumbulladori/GZ
surdoni/GZ
surdu/FZ
surpu/FZ
sutzone/GZ
tabbacheri/IZ
taperi/IZ
tentadori/GZ
tiradore/GZ
toltu/FZ
tontone/GZ
tontu/FZ
topu/FZ
torcidori/GZ
tostu/FZ
trabballadore/GZ
tradutore/GZ
traitori/GZ
tramperi/IZ
trampuceri/IZ
tranneri/IZ
trapanadore/GZ
trapuleri/IZ
trasmitidore/GZ
trasteri/IZ
travagliatore/GZ
travoneri/IZ
trebuleri/IZ
treguleri/IZ
treuleri/IZ
tricadore/GZ
trigu/FZ
trintzadore/GZ
tristu/FZ
trobbuscadore/GZ
trobedheri/IZl
tropeidore/GZ
trudhuleri/IZ
truvutzeri/IZ
tumone/GZ
tundhu/FZ
tundu/FZ
tunnu/FZ
turpu/FZ
tzachedhadore/GZ
tzantzarreri/IZ
tzascheri/IZ
tzecu/FZ
tziveteri/IZ
tzopu/FZ
tzulpu/FZ
usciadore/GZ
vagabbunneri/IZ
vanganteri/IZ
ventuleri/IZ
viadori/GZ
vintuleri/IZ
volonteri/IZ
zoculeri/IZ
